Utah statutes.
31A-23a-704.   Penalties.
(1) (a)  If, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the commissioner finds
that the controlling producer or any other person has not materially complied
with this part, or any rule made or order issued under the part, the
commissioner may order the controlling producer to cease placing business with
the controlled insurer.
(b)  If the commissioner finds that because of the material noncompliance that
the controlled insurer or any policyholder of the controlled insurer has
suffered any loss or damage, the commissioner may maintain a civil action or
may intervene in an action brought by or on behalf of the insurer or
policyholder for recovery of compensatory damages for the benefit of the
insurer or policyholder or the commissioner may seek other appropriate relief.
(2)  If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of the controlled insurer
has been entered pursuant to Chapter 27a, Insurer Receivership Act, and the
receiver appointed under that order believes that the controlling producer or
any other person has not materially complied with this part, or any rule made
or order issued under this part, and the insurer suffered any loss or damage
as a result of the noncompliance, the receiver may maintain a civil action for
recovery of damages or other appropriate sanctions for the benefit of the
insurer.
(3)  Nothing in this section affects the right of the commissioner to impose
any other penalties provided for in this title.
(4)  Nothing contained in this section is intended to or shall in any manner
alter or affect the rights of policyholders, claimants, creditors, or other
third parties.
